Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201920-128
Pedestrian using cane or service animal; driver of vehicle; duties; violation; damages.

In addition to the provisions of sections 28-1313 and 28-1314, the driver of a vehicle approaching a totally or partially blind pedestrian who is carrying a cane predominantly white or metallic in color or using a service animal or a deaf or hard of hearing or physically disabled pedestrian who is using a service animal shall take all necessary precautions to avoid injury to such pedestrian, and any driver who fails to take such precautions shall be liable in damages for any injury caused such pedestrian. A totally or partially blind pedestrian not carrying such a cane or using a service animal or a deaf or hard of hearing or physically disabled pedestrian not using a service animal in any of the places, accommodations, or conveyances listed in section 20-127 shall have all of the rights and privileges conferred by law upon other persons, and the failure of a totally or partially blind pedestrian to carry such a cane or to use a service animal or the failure of a deaf or hard of hearing or physically disabled pedestrian to use a service animal in any such places, accommodations, or conveyances does not constitute and is not evidence of contributory negligence.

Laws 1971, LB 496, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1971, § 43-635;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 2;

Laws 1980, LB 932, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 254, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB806, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB248, § 2.
September 1, 2019